North Dakota statutes. TITLE 20.1 Game, Fish, Predators, and Boating
CHAPTER 20.1-09 Propagation of Protected Birds and Animals

20.1-09-01.
General penalty.

Any person violating a provision of this chapter for which a penalty is not specifically provided is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 16; 1975, ch. 106, § 208.

Cross-References.

As to duty of commissioner to keep records of permits issued, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-02-04.

Penalty for class B misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

20.1-09-02.
Permits to propagate, domesticate, or possess birds or animals.

Permits to propagate, domesticate, or possess live protected birds or animals may be issued by the director to any North Dakota resident. These permits expire on December thirty-first of the year they are issued. One permit may cover several species of birds or animals, but a single permit may not cover both birds and animals. No person may possess any live protected animal or bird without first obtaining a permit from the director.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 16; 1983, ch. 277, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 68.

Cross-References.

As to duty of commissioner to keep records of permits issued, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-02-04.

20.1-09-03.
Contents of application for permit to propagate, domesticate, or possess live birds or animals.

An application for a permit to propagate, domesticate, or possess live protected birds or animals must be made upon forms furnished by the director, must be signed by the applicant, and must state:

The name and address of the applicant.

A description of the premises where the applicant will keep the birds or animals.

The number and kind of birds or animals in the applicant’s possession at the time of application, and whether they are wild or domesticated.

Any other information the director requires.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 16; 1983, ch. 277, § 2; 1991, ch. 231, § 69.

20.1-09-04.
Reports to director by persons holding propagation permits — Contents of reports.

Every person holding a permit to propagate and domesticate protected birds or animals shall report to the director annually, on or before December thirty-first, any increase or decrease in the number of birds or animals held under the permit during the year in which the report is made.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 16; 1991, ch. 231, § 70.

20.1-09-05.
Sale, collection, and transportation of birds, animals, and eggs held for propagation — Director’s consent necessary.

Protected birds or animals held for propagation and domestication under a permit may be sold or transported live for propagation purposes. Their eggs may be collected, sold, or transported during seasons the director prescribes. All collections, sales, and shipments must be with the director’s written permission. Protected birds or animals raised in North Dakota under a propagation permit may be disposed of, with the director’s written permission, at times the director may prescribe. The carcasses of these birds or animals may be disposed of as food when properly identified by a suitable tag or seal furnished by the director.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 16; 1991, ch. 71, § 231.